Illinois, session 104th, SB27.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by changing Section 505 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 5/505)  (from Ch. 40, par. 505)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-967)8    Sec. 505. Child support; contempt; penalties. 9    (a) In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal 10separation, declaration of invalidity of marriage, or 11dissolution of a civil union, a proceeding for child support 12following a legal separation or dissolution of the marriage or 13civil union by a court that lacked personal jurisdiction over 14the absent spouse, a proceeding for modification of a previous 15order for child support under Section 510 of this Act, or any 16proceeding authorized under Section 501 or 601 of this Act, 17the court may order either or both parents owing a duty of 18support to a child of the marriage or civil union to pay an 19amount reasonable and necessary for support. The duty of 20support owed to a child includes the obligation to provide for 21the reasonable and necessary physical, mental and emotional 22health needs of the child. For purposes of this Section, the 23term "child" shall include any child under age 18 and any child   SB0027 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1age 19 or younger who is still attending high school. For 2purposes of this Section, the term "obligor" means the parent 3obligated to pay support to the other parent.4        (1) Child support guidelines. The Illinois Department 5    of Healthcare and Family Services shall adopt rules 6    establishing child support guidelines which include 7    worksheets to aid in the calculation of the child support 8    obligations and a schedule of basic child support 9    obligations that reflects the percentage of combined net 10    income that parents living in the same household in this 11    State ordinarily spend on their child. The child support 12    guidelines have the following purposes:13            (A) to establish as State policy an adequate 14        standard of support for a child, subject to the 15        ability of parents to pay;16            (B) to make child support obligations more 17        equitable by ensuring more consistent treatment of 18        parents in similar circumstances;19            (C) to improve the efficiency of the court process 20        by promoting settlements and giving courts and the 21        parties guidance in establishing levels of child 22        support;23            (D) to calculate child support based upon the 24        parents' combined net income estimated to have been 25        allocated for the support of the child if the parents 26        and child were living in an intact household;  SB0027 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1            (E) to adjust child support based upon the needs 2        of the child; and3            (F) to allocate the amount of child support to be 4        paid by each parent based upon a parent's net income 5        and the child's physical care arrangements.6        (1.5) Computation of basic child support obligation. 7    The court shall compute the basic child support obligation 8    by taking the following steps:9            (A) determine each parent's monthly net income;10            (B) add the parents' monthly net incomes together 11        to determine the combined monthly net income of the 12        parents;13            (C) select the corresponding appropriate amount 14        from the schedule of basic child support obligations 15        based on the parties' combined monthly net income and 16        number of children of the parties; and17            (D) calculate each parent's percentage share of 18        the basic child support obligation.19        Although a monetary obligation is computed for each 20    parent as child support, the receiving parent's share is 21    not payable to the other parent and is presumed to be spent 22    directly on the child. 23        (2) Duty of support. The court shall determine child 24    support in each case by applying the child support 25    guidelines unless the court makes a finding that 26    application of the guidelines would be inappropriate,   SB0027 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    after considering the best interests of the child and 2    evidence which shows relevant factors including, but not 3    limited to, one or more of the following:4            (A) the financial resources and needs of the 5        child;6            (B) the financial resources and needs of the 7        parents;8            (C) the standard of living the child would have 9        enjoyed had the marriage or civil union not been 10        dissolved; and11            (D) the physical and emotional condition of the 12        child and his or her educational needs.13        (3) Income.14            (A) As used in this Section, "gross income" means 15        the total of all income from all sources, except 16        "gross income" does not include (i) benefits received 17        by the parent from means-tested public assistance 18        programs, including, but not limited to, Temporary 19        Assistance for Needy Families, Supplemental Security 20        Income, and the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 21        Program or (ii) benefits and income received by the 22        parent for other children in the household, including, 23        but not limited to, child support, survivor benefits, 24        and foster care payments. Social security disability 25        and retirement benefits paid for the benefit of the 26        subject child must be included in the disabled or   SB0027 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        retired parent's gross income for purposes of 2        calculating the parent's child support obligation, but 3        the parent is entitled to a child support credit for 4        the amount of benefits paid to the other party for the 5        child. "Gross income" includes maintenance treated as 6        taxable income for federal income tax purposes to the 7        payee and received pursuant to a court order in the 8        pending proceedings or any other proceedings and shall 9        be included in the payee's gross income for purposes 10        of calculating the parent's child support obligation. 11            (B) As used in this Section, "net income" means 12        gross income minus either the standardized tax amount 13        calculated pursuant to subparagraph (C) of this 14        paragraph (3) or the individualized tax amount 15        calculated pursuant to subparagraph (D) of this 16        paragraph (3), and minus any adjustments pursuant to 17        subparagraph (F) of this paragraph (3). The 18        standardized tax amount shall be used unless the 19        requirements for an individualized tax amount set 20        forth in subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (3) are 21        met. "Net income" includes maintenance not includable 22        in the gross taxable income of the payee for federal 23        income tax purposes under a court order in the pending 24        proceedings or any other proceedings and shall be 25        included in the payee's net income for purposes of 26        calculating the parent's child support obligation.  SB0027 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1            (C) As used in this Section, "standardized tax 2        amount" means the total of federal and state income 3        taxes for a single person claiming the standard tax 4        deduction, one personal exemption, and the applicable 5        number of dependency exemptions for the minor child or 6        children of the parties, and Social Security and 7        Medicare tax calculated at the Federal Insurance 8        Contributions Act rate.9                (I) Unless a court has determined otherwise or 10            the parties otherwise agree, the party with the 11            majority of parenting time shall be deemed 12            entitled to claim the dependency exemption for the 13            parties' minor child.14                (II) The Illinois Department of Healthcare and 15            Family Services shall promulgate a standardized 16            net income conversion table that computes net 17            income by deducting the standardized tax amount 18            from gross income.19            (D) As used in this Section, "individualized tax 20        amount" means the aggregate of the following taxes:21                (I) federal income tax (properly calculated 22            withholding or estimated payments);23                (II) State income tax (properly calculated 24            withholding or estimated payments); and25                (III) Social Security or self-employment tax, 26            if applicable (or, if none, mandatory retirement   SB0027 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1            contributions required by law or as a condition of 2            employment) and Medicare tax calculated at the 3            Federal Insurance Contributions Act rate.4            (E) In lieu of a standardized tax amount, a 5        determination of an individualized tax amount may be 6        made under items (I), (II), or (III) below. If an 7        individualized tax amount determination is made under 8        this subparagraph (E), all relevant tax attributes 9        (including filing status, allocation of dependency 10        exemptions, and whether a party is to claim the use of 11        the standard deduction or itemized deductions for 12        federal income tax purposes) shall be as the parties 13        agree or as the court determines. To determine a 14        party's reported income, the court may order the party 15        to complete an Internal Revenue Service Form 4506-T, 16        Request for Tax Transcript. 17                (I) Agreement. Irrespective of whether the 18            parties agree on any other issue before the court, 19            if they jointly stipulate for the record their 20            concurrence on a computation method for the 21            individualized tax amount that is different from 22            the method set forth under subparagraph (D), the 23            stipulated method shall be used by the court 24            unless the court rejects the proposed stipulated 25            method for good cause.26                (II) Summary hearing. If the court determines   SB0027 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1            child support in a summary hearing under Section 2            501 and an eligible party opts in to the 3            individualized tax amount method under this item 4            (II), the individualized tax amount shall be 5            determined by the court on the basis of 6            information contained in one or both parties' 7            Supreme Court approved Financial Affidavit (Family &8             Divorce Cases) and relevant supporting documents 9            under applicable court rules. No party, however, 10            is eligible to opt in unless the party, under 11            applicable court rules, has served the other party 12            with the required Supreme Court approved Financial 13            Affidavit (Family & Divorce Cases) and has 14            substantially produced supporting documents 15            required by the applicable court rules.16                (III) Evidentiary hearing. If the court 17            determines child support in an evidentiary 18            hearing, whether for purposes of a temporary order 19            or at the conclusion of a proceeding, item (II) of 20            this subparagraph (E) does not apply. In each such 21            case (unless item (I) governs), the individualized 22            tax amount shall be as determined by the court on 23            the basis of the record established. 24            (F) Adjustments to income.25                (I) Multi-family adjustment. If a parent is 26            also legally responsible for support of a child   SB0027 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1            not shared with the other parent and not subject 2            to the present proceeding, there shall be an 3            adjustment to net income as follows:4                    (i) Multi-family adjustment with court 5                order. The court shall deduct from the 6                parent's net income the amount of child 7                support actually paid by the parent pursuant 8                to a support order unless the court makes a 9                finding that it would cause economic hardship 10                to the child.11                    (ii) Multi-family adjustment without court 12                order. Upon the request or application of a 13                parent actually supporting a presumed, 14                acknowledged, or adjudicated child living in 15                or outside of that parent's household, there 16                shall be an adjustment to child support. The 17                court shall deduct from the parent's net 18                income the amount of financial support 19                actually paid by the parent for the child or 20                75% of the support the parent should pay under 21                the child support guidelines (before this 22                adjustment), whichever is less, unless the 23                court makes a finding that it would cause 24                economic hardship to the child. The adjustment 25                shall be calculated using that parent's income 26                alone.  SB0027 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1                (II) Spousal Maintenance adjustment. 2            Obligations pursuant to a court order for spousal 3            maintenance in the pending proceeding actually 4            paid or payable to the same party to whom child 5            support is to be payable or actually paid to a 6            former spouse pursuant to a court order shall be 7            deducted from the parent's after-tax income, 8            unless the maintenance obligation is tax 9            deductible to the payor for federal income tax 10            purposes, in which case it shall be deducted from 11            the payor's gross income for purposes of 12            calculating the parent's child support obligation.13        (3.1) Business income. For purposes of calculating 14    child support, net business income from the operation of a 15    business means gross receipts minus ordinary and necessary 16    expenses required to carry on the trade or business. As 17    used in this paragraph, "business" includes, but is not 18    limited to, sole proprietorships, closely held 19    corporations, partnerships, other flow-through business 20    entities, and self-employment. The court shall apply the 21    following:22            (A) The accelerated component of depreciation and 23        any business expenses determined either judicially or 24        administratively to be inappropriate or excessive 25        shall be excluded from the total of ordinary and 26        necessary business expenses to be deducted in the   SB0027 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        determination of net business income from gross 2        business income.3            (B) Any item of reimbursement or in-kind payment 4        received by a parent from a business, including, but 5        not limited to, a company car, reimbursed meals, free 6        housing, or a housing allowance, shall be counted as 7        income if not otherwise included in the recipient's 8        gross income, if the item is significant in amount and 9        reduces personal expenses.10        (3.2) Unemployment or underemployment. If a parent is 11    voluntarily unemployed or underemployed, child support 12    shall be calculated based on a determination of potential 13    income. A determination of potential income shall be made 14    by determining employment potential and probable earnings 15    level based on the obligor's work history, occupational 16    qualifications, prevailing job opportunities, the 17    ownership by a parent of a substantial non-income 18    producing asset, and earnings levels in the community. If 19    there is insufficient work history to determine employment 20    potential and probable earnings level, there shall be a 21    rebuttable presumption that the parent's potential income 22    is 75% of the most recent United States Department of 23    Health and Human Services Federal Poverty Guidelines for a 24    family of one person.25        (3.3) Rebuttable presumption in favor of guidelines. 26    There is a rebuttable presumption in any judicial or   SB0027 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    administrative proceeding for child support that the 2    amount of the child support obligation that would result 3    from the application of the child support guidelines is 4    the correct amount of child support. 5        (3.3a) Minimum child support obligation. There is a 6    rebuttable presumption that a minimum child support 7    obligation of $40 per month, per child, will be entered 8    for an obligor who has actual or imputed gross income at or 9    less than 75% of the most recent United States Department 10    of Health and Human Services Federal Poverty Guidelines 11    for a family of one person, with a maximum total child 12    support obligation for that obligor of $120 per month to 13    be divided equally among all of the obligor's children.14        (3.3b) Zero dollar child support order. For parents 15    with no gross income, who receive only means-tested 16    assistance, or who cannot work due to a medically proven 17    disability, incarceration, or institutionalization, there 18    is a rebuttable presumption that the $40 per month minimum 19    support order is inapplicable and a zero dollar order 20    shall be entered. 21        (3.4) Deviation factors. In any action to establish or 22    modify child support, whether pursuant to a temporary or 23    final administrative or court order, the child support 24    guidelines shall be used as a rebuttable presumption for 25    the establishment or modification of the amount of child 26    support. The court may deviate from the child support   SB0027 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    guidelines if the application would be inequitable, 2    unjust, or inappropriate. Any deviation from the 3    guidelines shall be accompanied by written findings by the 4    court specifying the reasons for the deviation and the 5    presumed amount under the child support guidelines without 6    a deviation. These reasons may include:7            (A) extraordinary medical expenditures necessary 8        to preserve the life or health of a party or a child of 9        either or both of the parties;10            (B) additional expenses incurred for a child 11        subject to the child support order who has special 12        medical, physical, or developmental needs; and13            (C) any other factor the court determines should 14        be applied upon a finding that the application of the 15        child support guidelines would be inappropriate, after 16        considering the best interest of the child. 17        (3.5) Income in excess of the schedule of basic child 18    support obligation. A court may use its discretion to 19    determine child support if the combined adjusted net 20    income of the parties exceeds the highest level of the 21    schedule of basic child support obligation, except that 22    the basic child support obligation shall not be less than 23    the highest level of combined net income set forth in the 24    schedule of basic child support obligation. 25        (3.6) Extracurricular activities and school expenses. 26    The court, in its discretion, in addition to the basic   SB0027 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    child support obligation, may order either or both parents 2    owing a duty of support to the child to contribute to the 3    reasonable school and extracurricular activity expenses 4    incurred which are intended to enhance the educational, 5    athletic, social, or cultural development of the child.6        (3.7) Child care expenses. The court, in its 7    discretion, in addition to the basic child support 8    obligation, may order either or both parents owing a duty 9    of support to the child to contribute to the reasonable 10    child care expenses of the child. The child care expenses 11    shall be made payable directly to a party or directly to 12    the child care provider at the time of child care 13    services. 14            (A) "Child care expenses" means actual expenses 15        reasonably necessary to enable a parent or non-parent 16        custodian to be employed, to attend educational or 17        vocational training programs to improve employment 18        opportunities, or to search for employment. "Child 19        care expenses" also includes deposits for securing 20        placement in a child care program, the cost of before 21        and after school care, and camps when school is not in 22        session. A child's special needs shall be a 23        consideration in determining reasonable child care 24        expenses.25            (B) Child care expenses shall be prorated in 26        proportion to each parent's percentage share of   SB0027 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        combined net income, and may be added to the basic 2        child support obligation if not paid directly by each 3        parent to the provider of child care services. The 4        obligor's and obligee's portion of actual child care 5        expenses shall appear in the support order. If 6        allowed, the value of the federal income tax credit 7        for child care shall be subtracted from the actual 8        cost to determine the net child care costs.9            (C) The amount of child care expenses shall be 10        adequate to obtain reasonable and necessary child 11        care. The actual child care expenses shall be used to 12        calculate the child care expenses, if available. When 13        actual child care expenses vary, the actual child care 14        expenses may be averaged over the most recent 12-month 15        period. When a parent is temporarily unemployed or 16        temporarily not attending educational or vocational 17        training programs, future child care expenses shall be 18        based upon prospective expenses to be incurred upon 19        return to employment or educational or vocational 20        training programs.21            (D) An order for child care expenses may be 22        modified upon a showing of a substantial change in 23        circumstances. The party incurring child care expenses 24        shall notify the other party within 14 days of any 25        change in the amount of child care expenses that would 26        affect the annualized child care amount as determined   SB0027 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        in the support order. 2        (3.8) Shared physical care. If each parent exercises 3    146 or more overnights per year with the child, the basic 4    child support obligation is multiplied by 1.5 to calculate 5    the shared care child support obligation. The court shall 6    determine each parent's share of the shared care child 7    support obligation based on the parent's percentage share 8    of combined net income. The child support obligation is 9    then computed for each parent by multiplying that parent's 10    portion of the shared care support obligation by the 11    percentage of time the child spends with the other parent. 12    The respective child support obligations are then offset, 13    with the parent owing more child support paying the 14    difference between the child support amounts. The Illinois 15    Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 16    promulgate a worksheet to calculate child support in cases 17    in which the parents have shared physical care and use the 18    standardized tax amount to determine net income.19        (3.9) Split physical care. When there is more than one 20    child and each parent has physical care of at least one but 21    not all of the children, the support is calculated by 22    using 2 child support worksheets to determine the support 23    each parent owes the other. The support shall be 24    calculated as follows:25            (A) compute the support the first parent would owe 26        to other parent as if the child in his or her care was   SB0027 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        the only child of the parties; then2            (B) compute the support the other parent would owe 3        to the first parent as if the child in his or her care 4        were the only child of the parties; then5            (C) subtract the lesser support obligation from 6        the greater.7        The parent who owes the greater obligation shall be 8    ordered to pay the difference in support to the other 9    parent, unless the court determines, pursuant to other 10    provisions of this Section, that it should deviate from 11    the guidelines. 12        (4) Health care to be addressed by the court.13            (A) A portion of the basic child support 14        obligation is intended to cover basic ordinary 15        out-of-pocket medical expenses. The court, in its 16        discretion, in addition to the basic child support 17        obligation, shall also provide for the child's current 18        and future medical needs by ordering either or both 19        parents to initiate health insurance coverage for the 20        child through currently effective health insurance 21        policies held by the parent or parents, purchase one 22        or more or all health, dental, or vision insurance 23        policies for the child, or provide for the child's 24        current and future medical needs through some other 25        manner.26            (B) The court, in its discretion, may order either   SB0027 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        or both parents to contribute to the reasonable health 2        care needs of the child not covered by insurance, 3        including, but not limited to, unreimbursed medical, 4        dental, orthodontic, or vision expenses and any 5        prescription medication for the child not covered 6        under the child's health insurance.7            (C) If neither parent has access to appropriate 8        private health insurance coverage, the court may 9        order:10                (I) one or both parents to provide health 11            insurance coverage at any time it becomes 12            available at a reasonable cost; or13                (II) the parent or non-parent custodian with 14            primary physical responsibility for the child to 15            apply for public health insurance coverage for the 16            child and require either or both parents to pay a 17            reasonable amount of the cost of health insurance 18            for the child.19            The order may also provide that any time private 20        health insurance coverage is available at a reasonable 21        cost to that party it will be provided instead of cash 22        medical support. As used in this Section, "cash 23        medical support" means an amount ordered to be paid 24        toward the cost of health insurance provided by a 25        public entity or by another person through employment 26        or otherwise or for other medical costs not covered by   SB0027 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        insurance. 2            (D) The amount to be added to the basic child 3        support obligation shall be the actual amount of the 4        total health insurance premium that is attributable to 5        the child who is the subject of the order. If this 6        amount is not available or cannot be verified, the 7        total cost of the health insurance premium shall be 8        divided by the total number of persons covered by the 9        policy. The cost per person derived from this 10        calculation shall be multiplied by the number of 11        children who are the subject of the order and who are 12        covered under the health insurance policy. This amount 13        shall be added to the basic child support obligation 14        and shall be allocated between the parents in 15        proportion to their respective net incomes.16            (E) After the health insurance premium for the 17        child is added to the basic child support obligation 18        and allocated between the parents in proportion to 19        their respective incomes for child support purposes, 20        if the obligor is paying the premium, the amount 21        calculated for the obligee's share of the health 22        insurance premium for the child shall be deducted from 23        the obligor's share of the total child support 24        obligation. If the obligee is paying for private 25        health insurance for the child, the child support 26        obligation shall be increased by the obligor's share   SB0027 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        of the premium payment. The obligor's and obligee's 2        portion of health insurance costs shall appear in the 3        support order.4            (F) Prior to allowing the health insurance 5        adjustment, the parent requesting the adjustment must 6        submit proof that the child has been enrolled in a 7        health insurance plan and must submit proof of the 8        cost of the premium. The court shall require the 9        parent receiving the adjustment to annually submit 10        proof of continued coverage of the child to the other 11        parent, or as designated by the court.12            (G) A reasonable cost for providing health 13        insurance coverage for the child may not exceed 5% of 14        the providing parent's gross income. Parents with a 15        net income below 133% of the most recent United States 16        Department of Health and Human Services Federal 17        Poverty Guidelines or whose child is covered by 18        Medicaid based on that parent's income may not be 19        ordered to contribute toward or provide private 20        coverage, unless private coverage is obtainable 21        without any financial contribution by that parent.22            (H) If dental or vision insurance is included as 23        part of the employer's medical plan, the coverage 24        shall be maintained for the child. If not included in 25        the employer's medical plan, adding the dental or 26        vision insurance for the child is at the discretion of   SB0027 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        the court.2            (I) If a parent has been directed to provide 3        health insurance pursuant to this paragraph and that 4        parent's spouse or legally recognized partner provides 5        the insurance for the benefit of the child either 6        directly or through employment, a credit on the child 7        support worksheet shall be given to that parent in the 8        same manner as if the premium were paid by that parent.9        (4.5) In a proceeding for child support following 10    dissolution of the marriage or civil union by a court that 11    lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse, and 12    in which the court is requiring payment of support for the 13    period before the date an order for current support is 14    entered, there is a rebuttable presumption that the 15    obligor's net income for the prior period was the same as 16    his or her net income at the time the order for current 17    support is entered.18        (5) If the net income cannot be determined because of 19    default or any other reason, the court shall order support 20    in an amount considered reasonable in the particular case. 21    The final order in all cases shall state the support level 22    in dollar amounts. However, if the court finds that the 23    child support amount cannot be expressed exclusively as a 24    dollar amount because all or a portion of the obligor's 25    net income is uncertain as to source, time of payment, or 26    amount, the court may order a percentage amount of support   SB0027 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    in addition to a specific dollar amount and enter such 2    other orders as may be necessary to determine and enforce, 3    on a timely basis, the applicable support ordered.4        (6) If (i) the obligor was properly served with a 5    request for discovery of financial information relating to 6    the obligor's ability to provide child support, (ii) the 7    obligor failed to comply with the request, despite having 8    been ordered to do so by the court, and (iii) the obligor 9    is not present at the hearing to determine support despite 10    having received proper notice, then any relevant financial 11    information concerning the obligor's ability to provide 12    child support that was obtained pursuant to subpoena and 13    proper notice shall be admitted into evidence without the 14    need to establish any further foundation for its 15    admission.16    (a-3) Life insurance to secure support. At the discretion 17of the court, a child support obligation pursuant to this 18Section and Sections 510, 513, and 513.5 of this Act may be 19secured, in whole or in part, by reasonably affordable life 20insurance on the life of one or both parents on such terms as 21the parties agree or as the court orders. The court may require 22such insurance remain in full force and effect until the 23termination of all obligations of support, subject to the 24following:25        (1) Existing life insurance. The court shall be 26    apprised through evidence, stipulation, or otherwise as to   SB0027 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    the level, ownership, and type of existing life insurance 2    death benefit coverage available to one or both parents, 3    the cost of the premiums, cost ratings, and escalations 4    and assignment of the policy, if applicable, and all other 5    relevant circumstances. The court shall make findings 6    relative thereto.7        (2) New life insurance. The court shall be apprised 8    through evidence, stipulation, or otherwise as to the 9    availability of obtaining reasonably affordable new life 10    insurance. To the extent the court determines that the 11    support obligations should be secured, in whole or in 12    part, by new life insurance on the life of one or both 13    parents, the court may order that one or both parents 14    comply with all requirements to obtain such new life 15    insurance through employment, trade union, fraternal 16    organizations, associations, or individual means.17        In determining the level and type of death benefits 18    coverage to be obtained by a parent, the court shall 19    consider access and availability of life insurance to that 20    parent, the cost of the premium, cost ratings, and 21    escalations, if applicable, and all other relevant 22    circumstances.23        (3) Other security. If life insurance is unavailable 24    to a parent, the court, in its discretion, or as agreed to 25    by the parties, may order other equitable and reasonable 26    means to secure a child support obligation.   SB0027 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    (a-5) In an action to enforce an order for child support 2based on the obligor's failure to make support payments as 3required by the order, notice of proceedings to hold the 4obligor in contempt for that failure may be served on the 5obligor by personal service or by regular mail addressed to 6the last known address of the obligor. The last known address 7of the obligor may be determined from records of the clerk of 8the court, from the Federal Case Registry of Child Support 9Orders, or by any other reasonable means.10    (b) Failure of either parent to comply with an order to pay 11support shall be punishable as in other cases of contempt. In 12addition to other penalties provided by law the court may, 13after finding the parent guilty of contempt, order that the 14parent be:15        (1) placed on probation with such conditions of 16    probation as the court deems advisable;17        (2) sentenced to periodic imprisonment for a period 18    not to exceed 6 months; provided, however, that the court 19    may permit the parent to be released for periods of time 20    during the day or night to:21            (A) work; or22            (B) conduct a business or other self-employed 23        occupation.24    The court may further order any part or all of the earnings 25of a parent during a sentence of periodic imprisonment paid to 26the Clerk of the Circuit Court or to the parent having physical   SB0027 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1possession of the child or to the non-parent custodian having 2custody of the child of the sentenced parent for the support of 3the child until further order of the court.4    If a parent who is found guilty of contempt for failure to 5comply with an order to pay support is a person who conducts a 6business or who is self-employed, the court in addition to 7other penalties provided by law may order that the parent do 8one or more of the following: (i) provide to the court monthly 9financial statements showing income and expenses from the 10business or the self-employment; (ii) seek employment and 11report periodically to the court with a diary, listing, or 12other memorandum of his or her employment search efforts; or 13(iii) report to the Department of Employment Security for job 14search services to find employment that will be subject to 15withholding for child support. 16    If there is a unity of interest and ownership sufficient 17to render no financial separation between an obligor and 18another person or persons or business entity, the court may 19pierce the ownership veil of the person, persons, or business 20entity to discover assets of the obligor held in the name of 21that person, those persons, or that business entity. The 22following circumstances are sufficient to authorize a court to 23order discovery of the assets of a person, persons, or 24business entity and to compel the application of any 25discovered assets toward payment on the judgment for support:26        (1) the obligor and the person, persons, or business   SB0027 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    entity maintain records together.2        (2) the obligor and the person, persons, or business 3    entity fail to maintain an arm's length relationship 4    between themselves with regard to any assets.5        (3) the obligor transfers assets to the person, 6    persons, or business entity with the intent to perpetrate 7    a fraud on the obligee.8    With respect to assets which are real property, no order 9entered under this paragraph shall affect the rights of bona 10fide purchasers, mortgagees, judgment creditors, or other lien 11holders who acquire their interests in the property prior to 12the time a notice of lis pendens pursuant to the Code of Civil 13Procedure or a copy of the order is placed of record in the 14office of the recorder of deeds for the county in which the 15real property is located.16    The court may also order in cases where the parent is 90 17days or more delinquent in payment of support or has been 18adjudicated in arrears in an amount equal to 90 days 19obligation or more, that the parent's Illinois driving 20privileges be suspended until the court determines that the 21parent is in compliance with the order of support. The court 22may also order that the parent be issued a family financial 23responsibility driving permit that would allow limited driving 24privileges for employment and medical purposes in accordance 25with Section 7-702.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The Clerk 26of the Circuit Court shall certify the order suspending the   SB0027 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1driving privileges of the parent or granting the issuance of a 2family financial responsibility driving permit to the 3Secretary of State on forms prescribed by the Secretary of 4State. Upon receipt of the authenticated documents, the 5Secretary of State shall suspend the parent's driving 6privileges until further order of the court and shall, if 7ordered by the court, subject to the provisions of Section 87-702.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, issue a family financial 9responsibility driving permit to the parent.10    In addition to the penalties or punishment that may be 11imposed under this Section, any person whose conduct 12constitutes a violation of Section 15 of the Non-Support 13Punishment Act may be prosecuted under that Act, and a person 14convicted under that Act may be sentenced in accordance with 15that Act. The sentence may include but need not be limited to a 16requirement that the person perform community service under 17Section 50 of that Act or participate in a work alternative 18program under Section 50 of that Act. A person may not be 19required to participate in a work alternative program under 20Section 50 of that Act if the person is currently 21participating in a work program pursuant to Section 505.1 of 22this Act.23    A support obligation, or any portion of a support 24obligation, which becomes due and remains unpaid as of the end 25of each month, excluding the child support that was due for 26that month to the extent that it was not paid in that month,   SB0027 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1shall accrue simple interest as set forth in Section 12-109 of 2the Code of Civil Procedure. An order for support entered or 3modified on or after January 1, 2006 shall contain a statement 4that a support obligation required under the order, or any 5portion of a support obligation required under the order, that 6becomes due and remains unpaid as of the end of each month, 7excluding the child support that was due for that month to the 8extent that it was not paid in that month, shall accrue simple 9interest as set forth in Section 12-109 of the Code of Civil 10Procedure. Failure to include the statement in the order for 11support does not affect the validity of the order or the 12accrual of interest as provided in this Section.13    (c) A one-time charge of 20% is imposable upon the amount 14of past-due child support owed on July 1, 1988 which has 15accrued under a support order entered by the court. The charge 16shall be imposed in accordance with the provisions of Section 1710-21 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and shall be enforced by 18the court upon petition.19    (d) Any new or existing support order entered by the court 20under this Section shall be deemed to be a series of judgments 21against the person obligated to pay support thereunder, each 22such judgment to be in the amount of each payment or 23installment of support and each such judgment to be deemed 24entered as of the date the corresponding payment or 25installment becomes due under the terms of the support order. 26Each such judgment shall have the full force, effect and   SB0027 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1attributes of any other judgment of this State, including the 2ability to be enforced. Notwithstanding any other State or 3local law to the contrary, a lien arises by operation of law 4against the real and personal property of the obligor for each 5installment of overdue support owed by the obligor.6    (e) When child support is to be paid through the Clerk of 7the Court in a county of 500,000 inhabitants or less, the order 8shall direct the obligor to pay to the Clerk, in addition to 9the child support payments, all fees imposed by the county 10board under paragraph (4) of subsection (bb) of Section 27.1a 11of the Clerks of Courts Act. When child support is to be paid 12through the clerk of the court in a county of more than 500,000 13but less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the order shall direct 14the obligor to pay to the clerk, in addition to the child 15support payments, all fees imposed by the county board under 16paragraph (4) of subsection (bb) of Section 27.2 of the Clerks 17of Courts Act. Unless paid pursuant to an Income Withholding 18Order/Notice for Support, the payment of the fee shall be by 19payment acceptable to the clerk and shall be made to the order 20of the Clerk.21    (f) All orders for support, when entered or modified, 22shall include a provision requiring the obligor to notify the 23court and, in cases in which a party is receiving child and 24spouse services under Article X of the Illinois Public Aid 25Code, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, within 267 days, (i) of the name and address of any new employer of the   SB0027 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1obligor, (ii) whether the obligor has access to health 2insurance coverage through the employer or other group 3coverage and, if so, the policy name and number and the names 4of persons covered under the policy, except only the initials 5of any covered minors shall be included, and (iii) of any new 6residential or mailing address or telephone number of the 7obligor. In any subsequent action to enforce a support order, 8upon a sufficient showing that a diligent effort has been made 9to ascertain the location of the obligor, service of process 10or provision of notice necessary in the case may be made at the 11last known address of the obligor in any manner expressly 12provided by the Code of Civil Procedure or this Act, which 13service shall be sufficient for purposes of due process.14    (g) An order for support shall include a date on which the 15current support obligation terminates. The termination date 16shall be no earlier than the date on which the child covered by 17the order will attain the age of 18. However, if the child will 18not graduate from high school until after attaining the age of 1918, then the termination date shall be no earlier than the 20earlier of the date on which the child's high school 21graduation will occur or the date on which the child will 22attain the age of 19. The order for support shall state that 23the termination date does not apply to any arrearage that may 24remain unpaid on that date. Nothing in this subsection shall 25be construed to prevent the court from modifying the order or 26terminating the order in the event the child is otherwise   SB0027 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1emancipated.2    (g-5) If there is an unpaid arrearage or delinquency (as 3those terms are defined in the Income Withholding for Support 4Act) equal to at least one month's support obligation on the 5termination date stated in the order for support or, if there 6is no termination date stated in the order, on the date the 7child attains the age of majority or is otherwise emancipated, 8the periodic amount required to be paid for current support of 9that child immediately prior to that date shall automatically 10continue to be an obligation, not as current support but as 11periodic payment toward satisfaction of the unpaid arrearage 12or delinquency. That periodic payment shall be in addition to 13any periodic payment previously required for satisfaction of 14the arrearage or delinquency. The total periodic amount to be 15paid toward satisfaction of the arrearage or delinquency may 16be enforced and collected by any method provided by law for 17enforcement and collection of child support, including but not 18limited to income withholding under the Income Withholding for 19Support Act. Each order for support entered or modified on or 20after January 1, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 2193-1061) must contain a statement notifying the parties of the 22requirements of this subsection. Failure to include the 23statement in the order for support does not affect the 24validity of the order or the operation of the provisions of 25this subsection with regard to the order. This subsection 26shall not be construed to prevent or affect the establishment   SB0027 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1or modification of an order for support of a minor child or the 2establishment or modification of an order for support of a 3non-minor child or educational expenses under Section 513 of 4this Act. 5    (h) An order entered under this Section shall include a 6provision requiring either parent to report to the other 7parent and to the Clerk of Court within 10 days each time 8either parent obtains new employment, and each time either 9parent's employment is terminated for any reason. The report 10shall be in writing and shall, in the case of new employment, 11include the name and address of the new employer. Failure to 12report new employment or the termination of current 13employment, if coupled with nonpayment of support for a period 14in excess of 60 days, is indirect criminal contempt. For 15either parent arrested for failure to report new employment 16bond shall be set in the amount of the child support that 17should have been paid during the period of unreported 18employment. An order entered under this Section shall also 19include a provision requiring either obligor and obligee to 20advise the other of a change in residence within 5 days of the 21change except when the court finds that the physical, mental, 22or emotional health of a party or that of a child, or both, 23would be seriously endangered by disclosure of the party's 24address.25    (i) The court does not lose the powers of contempt, 26driver's license suspension, or other child support   SB0027 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1enforcement mechanisms, including, but not limited to, 2criminal prosecution as set forth in this Act, upon the 3emancipation of the minor child.4(Source: P.A. 102-823, eff. 5-13-22.) 5    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-967)6    Sec. 505. Child support; contempt; penalties. 7    (a) In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal 8separation, declaration of invalidity of marriage, or 9dissolution of a civil union, a proceeding for child support 10following a legal separation or dissolution of the marriage or 11civil union by a court that lacked personal jurisdiction over 12the absent spouse, a proceeding for modification of a previous 13order for child support under Section 510 of this Act, or any 14proceeding authorized under Section 501 or 601 of this Act, 15the court may order either or both parents owing a duty of 16support to a child of the marriage or civil union to pay an 17amount reasonable and necessary for support. The duty of 18support owed to a child includes the obligation to provide for 19the reasonable and necessary physical, mental and emotional 20health needs of the child. For purposes of this Section, the 21term "child" shall include any child under age 18 and any child 22over the age of 18 who has not attained age 19 and or younger 23who is still attending high school. For purposes of this 24Section, the term "obligor" means the parent obligated to pay 25support to the other parent.  SB0027 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        (1) Child support guidelines. The Illinois Department 2    of Healthcare and Family Services shall adopt rules 3    establishing child support guidelines which include 4    worksheets to aid in the calculation of the child support 5    obligations and a schedule of basic child support 6    obligations that reflects the percentage of combined net 7    income that parents living in the same household in this 8    State ordinarily spend on their child. The child support 9    guidelines have the following purposes:10            (A) to establish as State policy an adequate 11        standard of support for a child, subject to the 12        ability of parents to pay;13            (B) to make child support obligations more 14        equitable by ensuring more consistent treatment of 15        parents in similar circumstances;16            (C) to improve the efficiency of the court process 17        by promoting settlements and giving courts and the 18        parties guidance in establishing levels of child 19        support;20            (D) to calculate child support based upon the 21        parents' combined net income estimated to have been 22        allocated for the support of the child if the parents 23        and child were living in an intact household;24            (E) to adjust child support based upon the needs 25        of the child; and26            (F) to allocate the amount of child support to be   SB0027 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        paid by each parent based upon a parent's net income 2        and the child's physical care arrangements.3        (1.5) Computation of basic child support obligation. 4    The court shall compute the basic child support obligation 5    by taking the following steps:6            (A) determine each parent's monthly net income;7            (B) add the parents' monthly net incomes together 8        to determine the combined monthly net income of the 9        parents;10            (C) select the corresponding appropriate amount 11        from the schedule of basic child support obligations 12        based on the parties' combined monthly net income and 13        number of children of the parties; and14            (D) calculate each parent's percentage share of 15        the basic child support obligation.16        Although a monetary obligation is computed for each 17    parent as child support, the receiving parent's share is 18    not payable to the other parent and is presumed to be spent 19    directly on the child. 20        (2) Duty of support. The court shall determine child 21    support in each case by applying the child support 22    guidelines unless the court makes a finding that 23    application of the guidelines would be inappropriate, 24    after considering the best interests of the child and 25    evidence which shows relevant factors including, but not 26    limited to, one or more of the following:  SB0027 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1            (A) the financial resources and needs of the 2        child;3            (B) the financial resources and needs of the 4        parents;5            (C) the standard of living the child would have 6        enjoyed had the marriage or civil union not been 7        dissolved; and8            (D) the physical and emotional condition of the 9        child and his or her educational needs.10        (3) Income.11            (A) As used in this Section, "gross income" means 12        the total of all income from all sources, except 13        "gross income" does not include (i) benefits received 14        by the parent from means-tested public assistance 15        programs, including, but not limited to, Temporary 16        Assistance for Needy Families, Supplemental Security 17        Income, and the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 18        Program or (ii) benefits and income received by the 19        parent for other children in the household, including, 20        but not limited to, child support, survivor benefits, 21        and foster care payments. Social security disability 22        and retirement benefits paid for the benefit of the 23        subject child must be included in the disabled or 24        retired parent's gross income for purposes of 25        calculating the parent's child support obligation, but 26        the parent is entitled to a child support credit for   SB0027 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        the amount of benefits paid to the other party for the 2        child. "Gross income" includes maintenance treated as 3        taxable income for federal income tax purposes to the 4        payee and received pursuant to a court order in the 5        pending proceedings or any other proceedings and shall 6        be included in the payee's gross income for purposes 7        of calculating the parent's child support obligation. 8            (B) As used in this Section, "net income" means 9        gross income minus either the standardized tax amount 10        calculated pursuant to subparagraph (C) of this 11        paragraph (3) or the individualized tax amount 12        calculated pursuant to subparagraph (D) of this 13        paragraph (3), and minus any adjustments pursuant to 14        subparagraph (F) of this paragraph (3). The 15        standardized tax amount shall be used unless the 16        requirements for an individualized tax amount set 17        forth in subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (3) are 18        met. "Net income" includes maintenance not includable 19        in the gross taxable income of the payee for federal 20        income tax purposes under a court order in the pending 21        proceedings or any other proceedings and shall be 22        included in the payee's net income for purposes of 23        calculating the parent's child support obligation.24            (C) As used in this Section, "standardized tax 25        amount" means the total of federal and state income 26        taxes for a single person claiming the standard tax   SB0027 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        deduction, one personal exemption, and the applicable 2        number of dependency exemptions for the minor child or 3        children of the parties, and Social Security and 4        Medicare tax calculated at the Federal Insurance 5        Contributions Act rate.6                (I) Unless a court has determined otherwise or 7            the parties otherwise agree, the party with the 8            majority of parenting time shall be deemed 9            entitled to claim the dependency exemption for the 10            parties' minor child.11                (II) The Illinois Department of Healthcare and 12            Family Services shall promulgate a standardized 13            net income conversion table that computes net 14            income by deducting the standardized tax amount 15            from gross income.16            (D) As used in this Section, "individualized tax 17        amount" means the aggregate of the following taxes:18                (I) federal income tax (properly calculated 19            withholding or estimated payments);20                (II) State income tax (properly calculated 21            withholding or estimated payments); and22                (III) Social Security or self-employment tax, 23            if applicable (or, if none, mandatory retirement 24            contributions required by law or as a condition of 25            employment) and Medicare tax calculated at the 26            Federal Insurance Contributions Act rate.  SB0027 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1            (E) In lieu of a standardized tax amount, a 2        determination of an individualized tax amount may be 3        made under items (I), (II), or (III) below. If an 4        individualized tax amount determination is made under 5        this subparagraph (E), all relevant tax attributes 6        (including filing status, allocation of dependency 7        exemptions, and whether a party is to claim the use of 8        the standard deduction or itemized deductions for 9        federal income tax purposes) shall be as the parties 10        agree or as the court determines. To determine a 11        party's reported income, the court may order the party 12        to complete an Internal Revenue Service Form 4506-T, 13        Request for Tax Transcript. 14                (I) Agreement. Irrespective of whether the 15            parties agree on any other issue before the court, 16            if they jointly stipulate for the record their 17            concurrence on a computation method for the 18            individualized tax amount that is different from 19            the method set forth under subparagraph (D), the 20            stipulated method shall be used by the court 21            unless the court rejects the proposed stipulated 22            method for good cause.23                (II) Summary hearing. If the court determines 24            child support in a summary hearing under Section 25            501 and an eligible party opts in to the 26            individualized tax amount method under this item   SB0027 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1            (II), the individualized tax amount shall be 2            determined by the court on the basis of 3            information contained in one or both parties' 4            Supreme Court approved Financial Affidavit (Family &5             Divorce Cases) and relevant supporting documents 6            under applicable court rules. No party, however, 7            is eligible to opt in unless the party, under 8            applicable court rules, has served the other party 9            with the required Supreme Court approved Financial 10            Affidavit (Family & Divorce Cases) and has 11            substantially produced supporting documents 12            required by the applicable court rules.13                (III) Evidentiary hearing. If the court 14            determines child support in an evidentiary 15            hearing, whether for purposes of a temporary order 16            or at the conclusion of a proceeding, item (II) of 17            this subparagraph (E) does not apply. In each such 18            case (unless item (I) governs), the individualized 19            tax amount shall be as determined by the court on 20            the basis of the record established. 21            (F) Adjustments to income.22                (I) Multi-family adjustment. If a parent is 23            also legally responsible for support of a child 24            not shared with the other parent and not subject 25            to the present proceeding, there shall be an 26            adjustment to net income as follows:  SB0027 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1                    (i) Multi-family adjustment with court 2                order. The court shall deduct from the 3                parent's net income the amount of child 4                support actually paid by the parent pursuant 5                to a support order unless the court makes a 6                finding that it would cause economic hardship 7                to the child.8                    (ii) Multi-family adjustment without court 9                order. Upon the request or application of a 10                parent actually supporting a presumed, 11                acknowledged, or adjudicated child living in 12                or outside of that parent's household, there 13                shall be an adjustment to child support. The 14                court shall deduct from the parent's net 15                income the amount of financial support 16                actually paid by the parent for the child or 17                75% of the support the parent should pay under 18                the child support guidelines (before this 19                adjustment), whichever is less, unless the 20                court makes a finding that it would cause 21                economic hardship to the child. The adjustment 22                shall be calculated using that parent's income 23                alone.24                (II) Spousal Maintenance adjustment. 25            Obligations pursuant to a court order for spousal 26            maintenance in the pending proceeding actually   SB0027 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1            paid or payable to the same party to whom child 2            support is to be payable or actually paid to a 3            former spouse pursuant to a court order shall be 4            deducted from the parent's after-tax income, 5            unless the maintenance obligation is tax 6            deductible to the payor for federal income tax 7            purposes, in which case it shall be deducted from 8            the payor's gross income for purposes of 9            calculating the parent's child support obligation.10        (3.1) Business income. For purposes of calculating 11    child support, net business income from the operation of a 12    business means gross receipts minus ordinary and necessary 13    expenses required to carry on the trade or business. As 14    used in this paragraph, "business" includes, but is not 15    limited to, sole proprietorships, closely held 16    corporations, partnerships, other flow-through business 17    entities, and self-employment. The court shall apply the 18    following:19            (A) The accelerated component of depreciation and 20        any business expenses determined either judicially or 21        administratively to be inappropriate or excessive 22        shall be excluded from the total of ordinary and 23        necessary business expenses to be deducted in the 24        determination of net business income from gross 25        business income.26            (B) Any item of reimbursement or in-kind payment   SB0027 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        received by a parent from a business, including, but 2        not limited to, a company car, reimbursed meals, free 3        housing, or a housing allowance, shall be counted as 4        income if not otherwise included in the recipient's 5        gross income, if the item is significant in amount and 6        reduces personal expenses.7        (3.2a) Unemployment or underemployment. If a parent is 8    voluntarily unemployed or underemployed, child support 9    shall be calculated based on a determination of potential 10    income. In determining potential income, the court shall 11    consider the specific circumstances of a party, to the 12    extent known, including, but not limited to, the parent's:13            (1) assets;14            (2) ownership of a substantial non-income 15        producing asset;16            (3) residence;17            (4) employment and earning history;18            (5) job skills;19            (6) educational attainment;20            (7) literacy;21            (8) age;22            (9) health;23            (10) criminal records and other employment 24        barriers; and25            (11) record of seeking work.26        The court shall also consider the local job market,   SB0027 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    availability of local employers willing to hire the 2    parent, prevailing earning levels in the local community, 3    and other relevant background factors in the case. If 4    there is insufficient work history to determine employment 5    potential and probable earnings level, there shall be a 6    rebuttable presumption that the parent's potential income 7    is 75% of the most recent United States Department of 8    Health and Human Services Federal Poverty Guidelines for a 9    family of one person. Incarceration shall not be 10    considered voluntary unemployment for child support 11    purposes in establishing or modifying child support. 12        (3.2b) The court may impute income to a party only 13    upon conducting an evidentiary hearing or by agreement of 14    the parties. Imputation of income shall be accompanied by 15    specific written findings identifying the basis or bases 16    for imputation using these factors.17        (3.3) Rebuttable presumption in favor of guidelines. 18    There is a rebuttable presumption in any judicial or 19    administrative proceeding for child support that the 20    amount of the child support obligation that would result 21    from the application of the child support guidelines is 22    the correct amount of child support. 23        (3.3a) Minimum child support obligation. There is a 24    rebuttable presumption that a minimum child support 25    obligation of $40 per month, per child, will be entered 26    for an obligor who has actual or imputed gross income at or   SB0027 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    less than 75% of the most recent United States Department 2    of Health and Human Services Federal Poverty Guidelines 3    for a family of one person, with a maximum total child 4    support obligation for that obligor of $120 per month to 5    be divided equally among all of the obligor's children.6        (3.3b) Zero dollar child support order. For parents 7    with no gross income, who receive only means-tested 8    assistance, or who cannot work due to a medically proven 9    disability, incarceration, or institutionalization, there 10    is a rebuttable presumption that the $40 per month minimum 11    support order is inapplicable and a zero dollar order 12    shall be entered. 13        (3.4) Deviation factors. In any action to establish or 14    modify child support, whether pursuant to a temporary or 15    final administrative or court order, the child support 16    guidelines shall be used as a rebuttable presumption for 17    the establishment or modification of the amount of child 18    support. The court may deviate from the child support 19    guidelines if the application would be inequitable, 20    unjust, or inappropriate. Any deviation from the 21    guidelines shall be accompanied by written findings by the 22    court specifying the reasons for the deviation and the 23    presumed amount under the child support guidelines without 24    a deviation. These reasons may include:25            (A) extraordinary medical expenditures necessary 26        to preserve the life or health of a party or a child of   SB0027 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        either or both of the parties;2            (B) additional expenses incurred for a child 3        subject to the child support order who has special 4        medical, physical, or developmental needs; and5            (C) any other factor the court determines should 6        be applied upon a finding that the application of the 7        child support guidelines would be inappropriate, after 8        considering the best interest of the child. 9        (3.5) Income in excess of the schedule of basic child 10    support obligation. A court may use its discretion to 11    determine child support if the combined adjusted net 12    income of the parties exceeds the highest level of the 13    schedule of basic child support obligation, except that 14    the basic child support obligation shall not be less than 15    the highest level of combined net income set forth in the 16    schedule of basic child support obligation. 17        (3.6) Extracurricular activities and school expenses. 18    The court, in its discretion, in addition to the basic 19    child support obligation, may order either or both parents 20    owing a duty of support to the child to contribute to the 21    reasonable school and extracurricular activity expenses 22    incurred which are intended to enhance the educational, 23    athletic, social, or cultural development of the child.24        (3.7) Child care expenses. The court, in its 25    discretion, in addition to the basic child support 26    obligation, may order either or both parents owing a duty   SB0027 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    of support to the child to contribute to the reasonable 2    child care expenses of the child. The child care expenses 3    shall be made payable directly to a party or directly to 4    the child care provider at the time of child care 5    services. 6            (A) "Child care expenses" means actual expenses 7        reasonably necessary to enable a parent or non-parent 8        custodian to be employed, to attend educational or 9        vocational training programs to improve employment 10        opportunities, or to search for employment. "Child 11        care expenses" also includes deposits for securing 12        placement in a child care program, the cost of before 13        and after school care, and camps when school is not in 14        session. A child's special needs shall be a 15        consideration in determining reasonable child care 16        expenses.17            (B) Child care expenses shall be prorated in 18        proportion to each parent's percentage share of 19        combined net income, and may be added to the basic 20        child support obligation if not paid directly by each 21        parent to the provider of child care services. The 22        obligor's and obligee's portion of actual child care 23        expenses shall appear in the support order. If 24        allowed, the value of the federal income tax credit 25        for child care shall be subtracted from the actual 26        cost to determine the net child care costs.  SB0027 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1            (C) The amount of child care expenses shall be 2        adequate to obtain reasonable and necessary child 3        care. The actual child care expenses shall be used to 4        calculate the child care expenses, if available. When 5        actual child care expenses vary, the actual child care 6        expenses may be averaged over the most recent 12-month 7        period. When a parent is temporarily unemployed or 8        temporarily not attending educational or vocational 9        training programs, future child care expenses shall be 10        based upon prospective expenses to be incurred upon 11        return to employment or educational or vocational 12        training programs.13            (D) An order for child care expenses may be 14        modified upon a showing of a substantial change in 15        circumstances. The party incurring child care expenses 16        shall notify the other party within 14 days of any 17        change in the amount of child care expenses that would 18        affect the annualized child care amount as determined 19        in the support order. 20        (3.8) Shared physical care. If each parent exercises 21    146 or more overnights per year with the child, the basic 22    child support obligation is multiplied by 1.5 to calculate 23    the shared care child support obligation. The court shall 24    determine each parent's share of the shared care child 25    support obligation based on the parent's percentage share 26    of combined net income. The child support obligation is   SB0027 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    then computed for each parent by multiplying that parent's 2    portion of the shared care support obligation by the 3    percentage of time the child spends with the other parent. 4    The respective child support obligations are then offset, 5    with the parent owing more child support paying the 6    difference between the child support amounts. The Illinois 7    Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 8    promulgate a worksheet to calculate child support in cases 9    in which the parents have shared physical care and use the 10    standardized tax amount to determine net income.11        (3.9) Split physical care. When there is more than one 12    child and each parent has physical care of at least one but 13    not all of the children, the support is calculated by 14    using 2 child support worksheets to determine the support 15    each parent owes the other. The support shall be 16    calculated as follows:17            (A) compute the support the first parent would owe 18        to other parent as if the child in his or her care was 19        the only child of the parties; then20            (B) compute the support the other parent would owe 21        to the first parent as if the child in his or her care 22        were the only child of the parties; then23            (C) subtract the lesser support obligation from 24        the greater.25        The parent who owes the greater obligation shall be 26    ordered to pay the difference in support to the other   SB0027 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    parent, unless the court determines, pursuant to other 2    provisions of this Section, that it should deviate from 3    the guidelines. 4        (4) Health care to be addressed by the court.5            (A) A portion of the basic child support 6        obligation is intended to cover basic ordinary 7        out-of-pocket medical expenses. The court, in its 8        discretion, in addition to the basic child support 9        obligation, shall also provide for the child's current 10        and future medical needs by ordering either or both 11        parents to initiate health insurance coverage for the 12        child through currently effective health insurance 13        policies held by the parent or parents, purchase one 14        or more or all health, dental, or vision insurance 15        policies for the child, or provide for the child's 16        current and future medical needs through some other 17        manner.18            (B) The court, in its discretion, may order either 19        or both parents to contribute to the reasonable health 20        care needs of the child not covered by insurance, 21        including, but not limited to, unreimbursed medical, 22        dental, orthodontic, or vision expenses and any 23        prescription medication for the child not covered 24        under the child's health insurance.25            (C) If neither parent has access to appropriate 26        private health insurance coverage, the court may   SB0027 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        order:2                (I) one or both parents to provide health 3            insurance coverage at any time it becomes 4            available at a reasonable cost; or5                (II) the parent or non-parent custodian with 6            primary physical responsibility for the child to 7            apply for public health insurance coverage for the 8            child and require either or both parents to pay a 9            reasonable amount of the cost of health insurance 10            for the child.11            The order may also provide that any time private 12        health insurance coverage is available at a reasonable 13        cost to that party it will be provided instead of cash 14        medical support. As used in this Section, "cash 15        medical support" means an amount ordered to be paid 16        toward the cost of health insurance provided by a 17        public entity or by another person through employment 18        or otherwise or for other medical costs not covered by 19        insurance. 20            (D) The amount to be added to the basic child 21        support obligation shall be the actual amount of the 22        total health insurance premium that is attributable to 23        the child who is the subject of the order. If this 24        amount is not available or cannot be verified, the 25        total cost of the health insurance premium shall be 26        divided by the total number of persons covered by the   SB0027 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        policy. The cost per person derived from this 2        calculation shall be multiplied by the number of 3        children who are the subject of the order and who are 4        covered under the health insurance policy. This amount 5        shall be added to the basic child support obligation 6        and shall be allocated between the parents in 7        proportion to their respective net incomes.8            (E) After the health insurance premium for the 9        child is added to the basic child support obligation 10        and allocated between the parents in proportion to 11        their respective incomes for child support purposes, 12        if the obligor is paying the premium, the amount 13        calculated for the obligee's share of the health 14        insurance premium for the child shall be deducted from 15        the obligor's share of the total child support 16        obligation. If the obligee is paying for private 17        health insurance for the child, the child support 18        obligation shall be increased by the obligor's share 19        of the premium payment. The obligor's and obligee's 20        portion of health insurance costs shall appear in the 21        support order.22            (F) Prior to allowing the health insurance 23        adjustment, the parent requesting the adjustment must 24        submit proof that the child has been enrolled in a 25        health insurance plan and must submit proof of the 26        cost of the premium. The court shall require the   SB0027 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        parent receiving the adjustment to annually submit 2        proof of continued coverage of the child to the other 3        parent, or as designated by the court.4            (G) A reasonable cost for providing health 5        insurance coverage for the child may not exceed 5% of 6        the providing parent's gross income. Parents with a 7        net income below 133% of the most recent United States 8        Department of Health and Human Services Federal 9        Poverty Guidelines or whose child is covered by 10        Medicaid based on that parent's income may not be 11        ordered to contribute toward or provide private 12        coverage, unless private coverage is obtainable 13        without any financial contribution by that parent.14            (H) If dental or vision insurance is included as 15        part of the employer's medical plan, the coverage 16        shall be maintained for the child. If not included in 17        the employer's medical plan, adding the dental or 18        vision insurance for the child is at the discretion of 19        the court.20            (I) If a parent has been directed to provide 21        health insurance pursuant to this paragraph and that 22        parent's spouse or legally recognized partner provides 23        the insurance for the benefit of the child either 24        directly or through employment, a credit on the child 25        support worksheet shall be given to that parent in the 26        same manner as if the premium were paid by that parent.  SB0027 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1        (4.5) In a proceeding for child support following 2    dissolution of the marriage or civil union by a court that 3    lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse, and 4    in which the court is requiring payment of support for the 5    period before the date an order for current support is 6    entered, there is a rebuttable presumption that the 7    obligor's net income for the prior period was the same as 8    his or her net income at the time the order for current 9    support is entered.10        (5) If the net income cannot be determined because of 11    default or any other reason, the court shall order support 12    in an amount considered reasonable in the particular case. 13    The final order in all cases shall state the support level 14    in dollar amounts. However, if the court finds that the 15    child support amount cannot be expressed exclusively as a 16    dollar amount because all or a portion of the obligor's 17    net income is uncertain as to source, time of payment, or 18    amount, the court may order a percentage amount of support 19    in addition to a specific dollar amount and enter such 20    other orders as may be necessary to determine and enforce, 21    on a timely basis, the applicable support ordered.22        (6) If (i) the obligor was properly served with a 23    request for discovery of financial information relating to 24    the obligor's ability to provide child support, (ii) the 25    obligor failed to comply with the request, despite having 26    been ordered to do so by the court, and (iii) the obligor   SB0027 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    is not present at the hearing to determine support despite 2    having received proper notice, then any relevant financial 3    information concerning the obligor's ability to provide 4    child support that was obtained pursuant to subpoena and 5    proper notice shall be admitted into evidence without the 6    need to establish any further foundation for its 7    admission.8    (a-3) Life insurance to secure support. At the discretion 9of the court, a child support obligation pursuant to this 10Section and Sections 510, 513, and 513.5 of this Act may be 11secured, in whole or in part, by reasonably affordable life 12insurance on the life of one or both parents on such terms as 13the parties agree or as the court orders. The court may require 14such insurance remain in full force and effect until the 15termination of all obligations of support, subject to the 16following:17        (1) Existing life insurance. The court shall be 18    apprised through evidence, stipulation, or otherwise as to 19    the level, ownership, and type of existing life insurance 20    death benefit coverage available to one or both parents, 21    the cost of the premiums, cost ratings, and escalations 22    and assignment of the policy, if applicable, and all other 23    relevant circumstances. The court shall make findings 24    relative thereto.25        (2) New life insurance. The court shall be apprised 26    through evidence, stipulation, or otherwise as to the   SB0027 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1    availability of obtaining reasonably affordable new life 2    insurance. To the extent the court determines that the 3    support obligations should be secured, in whole or in 4    part, by new life insurance on the life of one or both 5    parents, the court may order that one or both parents 6    comply with all requirements to obtain such new life 7    insurance through employment, trade union, fraternal 8    organizations, associations, or individual means.9        In determining the level and type of death benefits 10    coverage to be obtained by a parent, the court shall 11    consider access and availability of life insurance to that 12    parent, the cost of the premium, cost ratings, and 13    escalations, if applicable, and all other relevant 14    circumstances.15        (3) Other security. If life insurance is unavailable 16    to a parent, the court, in its discretion, or as agreed to 17    by the parties, may order other equitable and reasonable 18    means to secure a child support obligation. 19    (a-5) In an action to enforce an order for child support 20based on the obligor's failure to make support payments as 21required by the order, notice of proceedings to hold the 22obligor in contempt for that failure may be served on the 23obligor by personal service or by regular mail addressed to 24the last known address of the obligor. The last known address 25of the obligor may be determined from records of the clerk of 26the court, from the Federal Case Registry of Child Support   SB0027 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1Orders, or by any other reasonable means.2    (b) Failure of either parent to comply with an order to pay 3support shall be punishable as in other cases of contempt. In 4addition to other penalties provided by law the court may, 5after finding the parent guilty of contempt, order that the 6parent be:7        (1) placed on probation with such conditions of 8    probation as the court deems advisable;9        (2) sentenced to periodic imprisonment for a period 10    not to exceed 6 months; provided, however, that the court 11    may permit the parent to be released for periods of time 12    during the day or night to:13            (A) work; or14            (B) conduct a business or other self-employed 15        occupation.16    The court may further order any part or all of the earnings 17of a parent during a sentence of periodic imprisonment paid to 18the Clerk of the Circuit Court or to the parent having physical 19possession of the child or to the non-parent custodian having 20custody of the child of the sentenced parent for the support of 21the child until further order of the court.22    If a parent who is found guilty of contempt for failure to 23comply with an order to pay support is a person who conducts a 24business or who is self-employed, the court in addition to 25other penalties provided by law may order that the parent do 26one or more of the following: (i) provide to the court monthly   SB0027 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1financial statements showing income and expenses from the 2business or the self-employment; (ii) seek employment and 3report periodically to the court with a diary, listing, or 4other memorandum of his or her employment search efforts; or 5(iii) report to the Department of Employment Security for job 6search services to find employment that will be subject to 7withholding for child support. 8    If there is a unity of interest and ownership sufficient 9to render no financial separation between an obligor and 10another person or persons or business entity, the court may 11pierce the ownership veil of the person, persons, or business 12entity to discover assets of the obligor held in the name of 13that person, those persons, or that business entity. The 14following circumstances are sufficient to authorize a court to 15order discovery of the assets of a person, persons, or 16business entity and to compel the application of any 17discovered assets toward payment on the judgment for support:18        (1) the obligor and the person, persons, or business 19    entity maintain records together.20        (2) the obligor and the person, persons, or business 21    entity fail to maintain an arm's length relationship 22    between themselves with regard to any assets.23        (3) the obligor transfers assets to the person, 24    persons, or business entity with the intent to perpetrate 25    a fraud on the obligee.26    With respect to assets which are real property, no order   SB0027 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1entered under this paragraph shall affect the rights of bona 2fide purchasers, mortgagees, judgment creditors, or other lien 3holders who acquire their interests in the property prior to 4the time a notice of lis pendens pursuant to the Code of Civil 5Procedure or a copy of the order is placed of record in the 6office of the recorder of deeds for the county in which the 7real property is located.8    The court may also order in cases where the parent is 90 9days or more delinquent in payment of support or has been 10adjudicated in arrears in an amount equal to 90 days 11obligation or more, that the parent's Illinois driving 12privileges be suspended until the court determines that the 13parent is in compliance with the order of support. The court 14may also order that the parent be issued a family financial 15responsibility driving permit that would allow limited driving 16privileges for employment and medical purposes in accordance 17with Section 7-702.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The Clerk 18of the Circuit Court shall certify the order suspending the 19driving privileges of the parent or granting the issuance of a 20family financial responsibility driving permit to the 21Secretary of State on forms prescribed by the Secretary of 22State. Upon receipt of the authenticated documents, the 23Secretary of State shall suspend the parent's driving 24privileges until further order of the court and shall, if 25ordered by the court, subject to the provisions of Section 267-702.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, issue a family financial   SB0027 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1responsibility driving permit to the parent.2    In addition to the penalties or punishment that may be 3imposed under this Section, any person whose conduct 4constitutes a violation of Section 15 of the Non-Support 5Punishment Act may be prosecuted under that Act, and a person 6convicted under that Act may be sentenced in accordance with 7that Act. The sentence may include but need not be limited to a 8requirement that the person perform community service under 9Section 50 of that Act or participate in a work alternative 10program under Section 50 of that Act. A person may not be 11required to participate in a work alternative program under 12Section 50 of that Act if the person is currently 13participating in a work program pursuant to Section 505.1 of 14this Act.15    A support obligation, or any portion of a support 16obligation, which becomes due and remains unpaid as of the end 17of each month, excluding the child support that was due for 18that month to the extent that it was not paid in that month, 19shall accrue simple interest as set forth in Section 12-109 of 20the Code of Civil Procedure. An order for support entered or 21modified on or after January 1, 2006 shall contain a statement 22that a support obligation required under the order, or any 23portion of a support obligation required under the order, that 24becomes due and remains unpaid as of the end of each month, 25excluding the child support that was due for that month to the 26extent that it was not paid in that month, shall accrue simple   SB0027 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1interest as set forth in Section 12-109 of the Code of Civil 2Procedure. Failure to include the statement in the order for 3support does not affect the validity of the order or the 4accrual of interest as provided in this Section.5    (c) A one-time charge of 20% is imposable upon the amount 6of past-due child support owed on July 1, 1988 which has 7accrued under a support order entered by the court. The charge 8shall be imposed in accordance with the provisions of Section 910-21 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and shall be enforced by 10the court upon petition.11    (d) Any new or existing support order entered by the court 12under this Section shall be deemed to be a series of judgments 13against the person obligated to pay support thereunder, each 14such judgment to be in the amount of each payment or 15installment of support and each such judgment to be deemed 16entered as of the date the corresponding payment or 17installment becomes due under the terms of the support order. 18Each such judgment shall have the full force, effect and 19attributes of any other judgment of this State, including the 20ability to be enforced. Notwithstanding any other State or 21local law to the contrary, a lien arises by operation of law 22against the real and personal property of the obligor for each 23installment of overdue support owed by the obligor.24    (e) When child support is to be paid through the Clerk of 25the Court in a county of 500,000 inhabitants or less, the order 26shall direct the obligor to pay to the Clerk, in addition to   SB0027 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1the child support payments, all fees imposed by the county 2board under paragraph (2) of subsection (j-5) of Section 27.1b 3of the Clerks of Courts Act. When child support is to be paid 4through the clerk of the court in a county of more than 500,000 5but less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the order shall direct 6the obligor to pay to the clerk, in addition to the child 7support payments, all fees imposed by the county board under 8paragraph (4) of subsection (bb) of Section 27.2 of the Clerks 9of Courts Act. Unless paid pursuant to an Income Withholding 10Order/Notice for Support, the payment of the fee shall be by 11payment acceptable to the clerk and shall be made to the order 12of the Clerk.13    (f) All orders for support, when entered or modified, 14shall include a provision requiring the obligor to notify the 15court and, in cases in which a party is receiving child and 16spouse services under Article X of the Illinois Public Aid 17Code, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, within 187 days, (i) of the name and address of any new employer of the 19obligor, (ii) whether the obligor has access to health 20insurance coverage through the employer or other group 21coverage and, if so, the policy name and number and the names 22of persons covered under the policy, except only the initials 23of any covered minors shall be included, and (iii) of any new 24residential or mailing address or telephone number of the 25obligor. In any subsequent action to enforce a support order, 26upon a sufficient showing that a diligent effort has been made   SB0027 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1to ascertain the location of the obligor, service of process 2or provision of notice necessary in the case may be made at the 3last known address of the obligor in any manner expressly 4provided by the Code of Civil Procedure or this Act, which 5service shall be sufficient for purposes of due process.6    (g) An order for support shall include a date on which the 7current support obligation terminates. The termination date 8shall be no earlier than the date on which the child covered by 9the order will attain the age of 18. However, if the child will 10not graduate from high school until after attaining the age of 1118, then the termination date shall be no earlier than the 12earlier of the date on which the child's high school 13graduation will occur or the date on which the child will 14attain the age of 19. The order for support shall state that 15the termination date does not apply to any arrearage that may 16remain unpaid on that date. Nothing in this subsection shall 17be construed to prevent the court from modifying the order or 18terminating the order in the event the child is otherwise 19emancipated.20    (g-5) If there is an unpaid arrearage or delinquency (as 21those terms are defined in the Income Withholding for Support 22Act) equal to at least one month's support obligation on the 23termination date stated in the order for support or, if there 24is no termination date stated in the order, on the date the 25child attains the age of majority or is otherwise emancipated, 26the periodic amount required to be paid for current support of   SB0027 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1that child immediately prior to that date shall automatically 2continue to be an obligation, not as current support but as 3periodic payment toward satisfaction of the unpaid arrearage 4or delinquency. That periodic payment shall be in addition to 5any periodic payment previously required for satisfaction of 6the arrearage or delinquency. The total periodic amount to be 7paid toward satisfaction of the arrearage or delinquency may 8be enforced and collected by any method provided by law for 9enforcement and collection of child support, including but not 10limited to income withholding under the Income Withholding for 11Support Act. Each order for support entered or modified on or 12after January 1, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 1393-1061) must contain a statement notifying the parties of the 14requirements of this subsection. Failure to include the 15statement in the order for support does not affect the 16validity of the order or the operation of the provisions of 17this subsection with regard to the order. This subsection 18shall not be construed to prevent or affect the establishment 19or modification of an order for support of a minor child or the 20establishment or modification of an order for support of a 21non-minor child or educational expenses under Section 513 of 22this Act. 23    (h) An order entered under this Section shall include a 24provision requiring either parent to report to the other 25parent and to the Clerk of Court within 10 days each time 26either parent obtains new employment, and each time either   SB0027 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1parent's employment is terminated for any reason. The report 2shall be in writing and shall, in the case of new employment, 3include the name and address of the new employer. Failure to 4report new employment or the termination of current 5employment, if coupled with nonpayment of support for a period 6in excess of 60 days, is indirect criminal contempt. For 7either parent arrested for failure to report new employment 8bond shall be set in the amount of the child support that 9should have been paid during the period of unreported 10employment. An order entered under this Section shall also 11include a provision requiring either obligor and obligee to 12advise the other of a change in residence within 5 days of the 13change except when the court finds that the physical, mental, 14or emotional health of a party or that of a child, or both, 15would be seriously endangered by disclosure of the party's 16address.17    (i) The court does not lose the powers of contempt, 18driver's license suspension, or other child support 19enforcement mechanisms, including, but not limited to, 20criminal prosecution as set forth in this Act, upon the 21emancipation of the minor child.22(Source: P.A. 102-823, eff. 5-13-22; 103-967, eff. 1-1-25.) 23    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 24changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 25that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section   SB0027 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 03086 JRC 13104 b1represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 2not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 3made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 4Public Act. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.